Washington statutes.
RCW 42.08.060

Form of official bonds.

All official bonds required by law of officers shall be in form, joint and several, and made payable to the state of Washington, in such penal sum and with such conditions as may be required by law.

[ 1890 p 34 s 1; RRS s 9930.]

NOTES:

Bonds deemed security to state, county, city, town, etc.: RCW 42.08.010.

County commissioner bond is payable to county: RCW 36.32.060.